North Carolina, session 2025, HB254.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 103 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 103-19. Tuskegee Airmen Commemoration Day.
The fourth Thursday of March is designated as Tuskegee Airmen Commemoration Day in
North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H254-v-1*